West Virginia, session 2026, HB5348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13. STOPPING, STANDING AND PARKING. §17C-13-9. Prohibition on pedestrians from standing in roadways or right of ways. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that the presence of persons standing in the middle of the roadway, on right of ways, or near the roadway creates significant public safety hazards for those individuals and motorists.(b) Enactment. –It is prohibited for anyone to stand in a roadway or on a right of way. (c) Penalty. – Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $100; upon a second conviction within one year thereafter, shall be fined not more than $200; and upon a third or subsequent conviction, shall be fined not more than $500.